Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3592
Hospital authority; trustees; appointment; objections; file with county clerk.

All electors residing within the boundaries of the authority who have not signed the petitions nominating a candidate for appointment to the board of trustees may, not less than five days prior to the date set for hearing on the nominations, file with the county clerk any objections to the appointment of any such candidate stating their objections to any one or more of the candidates.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.90.